Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-111 Loans to officers, etc. A
title insurer shall not directly or indirectly make a loan from its assets to
any of its officers, employees, or directors, or to any member of the family of
any officer or director. Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any such
insurer who knowingly consents to any violation of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next